src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_63VISKAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ viskama:viska
! from V_63SÕIMAMA 
! Ind.Prs.ScSg3 in -s
! vowel_harmony: back
!! gradation: yes
!! * Yaml: __V-viskama63__
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>dõq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>sõq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: BACK_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>dõ BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>mi BACK_K ;	!!= * @CODE@ no	q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ti BACK_K ;	!!= * @CODE@ no	q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>sõ BACK_K ;	!!= * @CODE@ no	q


+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^WGStem%>sʼ BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^WGStem%>ssi BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssit BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssidõq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>ssimiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>ssitiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ssiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ssivaq BACK_K ;

+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssi BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no	q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssidõ BACK_K ;   !!= * @CODE@ no	q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>ssimi BACK_K ;   !!= * @CODE@ no	q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>ssiti BACK_K ;   !!= * @CODE@ no	q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ssi BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no  q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ssiva BACK_K ;   !!= * @CODE@ no	q


+V:%^WGStem BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WGStem%>da BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^WGStem%>di BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>diq BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>diq BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>tit BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>tidõq BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^WGStem%>ti BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>timiq BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>titiq BACK_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>tivaq BACK_K ;

+Use/NG+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>di BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>di BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>tidõ BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>timi BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>titi BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>tiva BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q


+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^VowRM%>si BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>sit BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>siq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>sidõq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^VowRM%>simiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^VowRM%>sitiq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>siq BACK_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>sivaq BACK_K ;

+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>si BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>sidõ BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^VowRM%>simi BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^VowRM%>siti BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>si BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>siva BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ no    q


+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
!! (6) Ind_Prs_Sg2, Ind_Prs_Sg3, Ind_Prs_Pl2, Ind_Prs_Pl3,
!! Ind_Prt_OcPl3
!! ActPrsPrc, PssPrsPrc

+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ; 
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SC3_sʼ ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;



+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;

+V:%^WGStem BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_VISKAMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%^WGStem%>tu BACK_K ;



LEXICON V_63HINGÄMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hingämä:hingä
! Ind.Prs.ScSg3 in -s
! vowel_harmony: front
!! gradation: no
!! * Yaml: __V-hingaemae63__

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>deq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>seq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: FRONT_K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^WGStem%>sʼ FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^WGStem%>ssi FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssit FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>ssideq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>ssimiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>ssitiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ssiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ssiväq FRONT_K ;

+V:%^WGStem FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;


+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WGStem%>dä FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^WGStem%>di FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>diq FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>diq FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>tit FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^WGStem%>tideq FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^WGStem%>ti FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^WGStem%>timiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^WGStem%>titiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^WGStem%>tiväq FRONT_K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^VowRM%>si FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>sit FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>siq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>sideq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^VowRM%>simiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^VowRM%>sitiq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>siq FRONT_K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>siväq FRONT_K ;



!+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
!+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
!+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
!+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;
!+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

!+V:%^VowRM%>s V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ; 
!+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SC3_sʼ ;
!+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;


+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;

+V:%^WGStem FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_VISKAMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%^WGStem%>tü FRONT_K ;


LEXICON V_64PUHKSAMA
! puhksama:puhkas
!! * Yaml: __V-puhksama64__
+V:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^Pen%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si-NO-s ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_IND-PRT-SC3_sʼ-NO-s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_V2N_minõ ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_INF_taq ;
+V:a BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_64REHKSÄMÄ
! rehksämä:rehkäs
!! * Yaml: __V-rehksaemae64__
+V:%^Pen%^VowRM%>ä FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRM%>ä FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^Pen%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si-NO-s ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_IND-PRT-SC3_sʼ-NO-s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_V2N_mine ;
+V:%^Pen%^VowRM%>ä FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_INF_täq ;
+V:ä FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_65SIBAHAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ >>88SIBAMA >>SIBAMA

+V+WORK: # ;
LEXICON V_67HARINÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ harinõma:hari
!! * Yaml: __harinwma66,harinwma67 =>harinwma__
+V:nõ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:nõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:nõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ;
+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SC3_si_WEAKGRADE ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:nõ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:nõ BACK_INF_daq ;
!+V+Err/Orth:nõ BACK_INF_daq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:nõ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V:nõ%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
