src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
aronõma:aro V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
arõnõma:arõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
hankama:hanka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
harinõma:hari V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
hellämä:hellä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
higonõma:higo V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
higovama:higova V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
higovama:higova V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
hiitämä:hiitä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
hilkama:hilka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
hirskama:hirska V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
hukkama:hukka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
hurssʼama:hurssʼa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
häitsemä:häitse V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
hälvämä:hälvä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
härrämä:härrä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
häägämä:häägä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
hõikama:hõika V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
hõrssama:hõrssa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
hölpämä:hölpä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
hülpämä:hülpä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
hürgämä:hürgä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
hürrämä:hürrä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
idonõma:ido V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
ihkama:ihka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
isonõma:isonõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
jagonõma:jago V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
janonõma:janonõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
julguma:julgu V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
kahanõma:kaha V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kakkama:kakka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
kargama:karga V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
kelpämä:kelpä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
kihonõma:kiho V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kirgämä:kirgä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
kliimämä:kliimä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
kogonõma:kogo V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kogovama:kogova V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kohonõma:koho V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
koolõnõma:koolõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
krunkama:krunka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
kudõnõma:kudõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kudõnõma:kudõnõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kuldama:kulda V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
kulunõma:kulu V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kuluvama:kuluva V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kulõnõma:kulõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
kärrämä:kärrä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
kõlbama:kõlba V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
kükkämä:kükkä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
lagonõma:lago V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
lagovama:lagova V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
lahenõma:lahe V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
lahkama:lahka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
lahksama:lahkas V_64PUHKSAMA  "" ;
leilämä:leilä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
ligonõma:ligo V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
ligovama:ligova V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
ligovama:ligova V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
lihonõma:liho V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
liimämä:liimä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
lindama:linda V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
läükämä:läükä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
lõikama:lõika V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
muhenõma:muhe V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
murdama:murda V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
murdsama:murdas V_64PUHKSAMA  "" ;
mähksämä:mähkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
märhämä:märhä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
mäürämä:mäürä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
mõrkama:mõrka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
mõrõnõma:mõrõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
mühksämä:mühkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
müürämä:müürä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
nilksama:nilkas V_64PUHKSAMA  "" ;
nilpsahama:nilpsaha V_65SIBAHAMA  "" ;
nippama:nippa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
nuurskama:nuurska V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
näpsämä:näpsä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
nühksämä:nühkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
nüürämä:nüürä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
ohkama:ohka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
oigõnõma:oigõnõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
palkama:palka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
paranõma:para V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
porkama:porka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
pragonõma:prago V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
prähvämä:prähvä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
pudõnõma:pudõ V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
puhkama:puhka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
puhksama:puhkas V_64PUHKSAMA  "" ;
puhksõma:puhkõs V_64PUHKSAMA  "" ;
purkama:purka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
pärrämä:pärrä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
põrkama:põrka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
pühksämä:pühkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
rehksämä:rehkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
reinämä:reinä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
ruttama:rutta V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
rändämä:rändä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
räämämä:räämä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
rõõhkama:rõõhka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
rüngämä:rüngä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
rüüstämä:rüüstä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
sillämä:sillä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
sippama:sippa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
sugunõma:sugu V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
sõlgama:sõlga V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
taganõma:taga V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
tehksämä:tehkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
tehnämä:tehnä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
tigonõma:tigo V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
tilkama:tilka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
trampama:trampa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
treiämä:treiä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
tsiukama:tsiuka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
tsäksämä:tsäksä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
tsäpsämä:tsäpsä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
tsüskämä:tsüskä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
tsʼorkama:tsʼorka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
tukkama:tukka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
tõnkama:tõnka V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
tüükämä:tüükä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
uhtsama:uhtas V_64PUHKSAMA  "" ;
vaapama:vaapa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
vehksämä:vehkäs V_64REHKSÄMÄ  "" ;
vigunõma:vigu V_67HARINÕMA  "" ;
vurtsama:vurtsa V_63VISKAMA  "" ;
väärämä:väärä V_63HINGÄMÄ  "" ;
